test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-liuota_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
  Verb - laueta - ei tsekattu : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     liuota+V+Inf: liuota
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liukkeon
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: liukkoot
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liukkoo
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: liukkooma
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: liukkootta
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: liuothaan
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: liukosin
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: liukosit
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: liukos
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: liukosimma
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: liukositta
     liuota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: liuothiin
     liuota+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: liuonu
     liuota+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: liuottu
     liuota+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: liuonhoot
     liuota+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: liukkoova
     liuota+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: liukkoovat
     liuota+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: liuottava
     liuota+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: liuottavat
     
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: liukkoisin
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: liukkoisit
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: liukkois
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: liukkoisimma
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: liukkoisitta
     liuota+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: liuottais
     liuota+V+Pass+Cond: liuottais
    
     liuota+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: liukkoo
     liuota+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: liuokkaa
     
     liuota+V+Act+Inf3+Ino: liukkoomassa
     liuota+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: liukkoomasta
     liuota+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: liukkoomhaan
     liuota+V+Act+Inf3+Ado: liukkoomalla
     liuota+V+Act+Inf3+Abo: liukkoomatta
